Louisiana, session 2026, HB651.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:6045 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§6045. Instructor Share Rebate Program
A. This Section shall be known and may be cited as the "Instructor Share
Rebate Act".
B. The legislature hereby finds that an insufficient number of people with
adequate levels of on-the-job training is an impediment to workforce development
and economic growth. The legislature further recognizes the vital role of the
Louisiana Community and Technical College System in delivering targeted,
high-quality technical and vocational training aligned with Louisiana's economic
needs. The legislature hereby declares that establishing a rebate which provides
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1307 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 651
incentives for businesses to share employees as postsecondary instructors is in the
best economic interest of this state.
C. There shall be allowed a rebate for an employer who allows his
employees to work as instructors in the Louisiana Community and Technical College
System. The amount of the rebate shall equal fifty percent of the cost to an employer
of allowing his employees to work as instructors in the Louisiana Community and
Technical College System. Except as provided in Paragraph (3) of this Subsection,
the maximum amount of rebates that may be claimed for a calendar year, referred to
hereafter as the "rebate cap", shall be as follows:
(1) For the calendar year beginning January 1, 2027, and ending December
31, 2027, the rebate cap shall be one million dollars.
(2) Beginning January 1, 2028, and each January first thereafter, the rebate
cap for the calendar year shall be established in accordance with the following
provisions:
(a) If the secretary of the Department of Revenue, referred to hereafter in this
Section as the "department", determines that less than eighty percent of the rebate
cap amount authorized for the preceding calendar year was granted, then the rebate
cap for the current calendar year shall not be adjusted.
(b) If the secretary of the department determines that at least eighty percent
of the rebate cap amount authorized for the preceding calendar year was granted,
then the rebate cap for the current calendar year shall be increased by one million
dollars.
(3) The rebate cap for a calendar year shall not exceed five million five
hundred thousand dollars.
D. No later than July first of each year, the secretary of the department shall
publish on the department's website a notice of the rebate cap amount authorized for
the calendar year in which the notice is published. However, when the rebate cap for
a calendar year reaches five million five hundred thousand dollars, the secretary shall
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1307 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 651
no longer be required to publish notice of the rebate cap amount on the department's
website.
E. The department, in consultation with the Louisiana Community and
Technical College System, shall establish by rule the procedures for determining a
taxpayer's eligibility for the rebate.
F.(1) Beginning January 1, 2027, taxpayers shall apply for the rebate on a
form and in the manner prescribed by the department. The application period shall
begin on January first and conclude on March first of each calendar year following
the calendar year in which the rebate is deemed earned. Eligible applications shall
be approved by the department on a first-come, first-served basis as determined by
the received date and time of a completed application. An application shall not be
considered complete until all information requested by the department has been
received. A taxpayer shall be deemed eligible upon satisfactorily demonstrating that
he has met the applicable requirements of this Section.
(2) If the aggregate amount of applications received on a single business day
exceeds the total amount of available rebates, the department shall approve rebates
on a pro rata basis.
G. The secretary of the department shall promulgate, in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act, all rules necessary to implement the provisions of this
Section, including rules providing for the form and procedure for claiming a rebate.
H. Rebates previously paid to a taxpayer as authorized by this Section, but
later disallowed, may be recovered by the secretary of the department through any
collection remedy authorized in R.S. 47:1561.2.
I. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the secretary of the
department shall make the rebates authorized in this Section from current collections
of state taxes.
Section 2. The rebate authorized in this Act shall not apply to costs incurred by
employers prior to January 1, 2026.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1307 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 651